Florida, session 2026, SB1342.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 43 44 Section 1.âSubsection (49) of section 163.3164, Florida 45 Statutes, is amended to read: 46 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 47 this act: 48 (49)ââTransit-oriented developmentâ or âTODâ means a 49 project or projects, in areas identified in a local government 50 comprehensive plan, that are is or will be served by existing or 51 planned transit service. These designated areas must allow shall 52 be compact, moderate to high density or intensity developments, 53 of mixed-use character which are, interconnected with other land 54 uses, bicycle and pedestrian friendly, and designed to support 55 or allow the use frequent transit service operating through, 56 collectively or separately, of any of the following: 57 (a)âA bus rapid transit service as defined in s. 58 163.32035(3)(d). 59 (b)âA commuter rail service as defined in s. 341.301. 60 (c)âAn intercity rail transportation system as defined in 61 s. 341.301. 62 (d)âA fixed-guideway transportation system as defined in s. 63 341.031(2). 64 (e)âA streetcar system. 65 (f)âA bus system rail, fixed guideway, streetcar, or bus 66 systems on dedicated facilities or available roadway 67 connections. 68 Section 2.âSection 163.32035, Florida Statutes, is created 69 to read: 70 163.32035âTransit-Oriented Development Act.âThe Transit 71 Oriented Development Act is created to make homeownership, 72 renting, and leasing more affordable for the residents of this 73 state and reduce chronic traffic congestion for the residents of 74 this state, by increasing the supply of housing and allowing 75 more residential and commercial development near transit 76 infrastructure. 77 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âTransit-Oriented 78 Development Actâ or the âTOD Act.â 79 (2)âThe Legislature finds that: 80 (a)âThe median price of homes in this state increased 81 steadily in the decade preceding 2026, rising at a greater rate 82 of increase than the median income in this state. 83 (b)âThere is a housing shortage in this state which has 84 caused the costs of homeownership, renting, and leasing to often 85 exceed an amount that is affordable for residents of this state. 86 (c)âThere is chronic traffic congestion on roadways in this 87 state which constrains economic activity across this state. 88 (d)âConstructing housing near transit infrastructure, such 89 as rail systems and rapid transit systems, will minimize the 90 traffic congestion caused by new residents and maximize state 91 and local government investments in transit infrastructure. 92 (e)âThe important public purpose sought to be achieved by 93 allowing an increase in residential and commercial development 94 near transit infrastructure is to increase the supply of housing 95 near transit infrastructure and reduce chronic traffic 96 congestion, which will make homeownership, renting, and leasing 97 more affordable for residents of this state, increase economic 98 activity across this state, and maximize state and local 99 government investments in transit infrastructure. 100 (3)âAs used in this section, the term: 101 (a)ââAdjacentâ means that two lots share more than one 102 point of a property line. Lots are not adjacent if separated by 103 a body of water, including manmade lakes or ponds, or by a 104 public easement or other right-of-way, including roads, 105 railroads, or canals. 106 (b)ââAdjacent to a single-family homeâ means adjacent to a 107 lot that is one of at least 25 contiguous residential lots, all 108 of which contain single-family detached homes on the date a 109 development application is submitted. 110 (c)ââBuilding heightâ means the number of stories or the 111 number of feet measured above grade or, if applicable, above the 112 base flood elevation established by the Federal Emergency 113 Management Agency. 114 (d)ââBus rapid transit serviceâ means a bus service with 115 headways of 15 minutes or less during peak periods which 116 operates in business access and transit lanes or in a right-of 117 way or lanes dedicated for public transit. If a bus service 118 meets the criteria of this paragraph for one or more parts, but 119 not all, of its route, the term includes only the parts of the 120 route which meet the criteria. As used in this paragraph, the 121 term âdedicated for public transitâ means dedicated for at least 122 4 hours per business day. The term âbusiness dayâ means all 123 calendar days except Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays under s. 124 110.117(1). 125 (e)ââBy rightâ means administrative approval by a local 126 government of a development application that objectively 127 complies with applicable zoning regulations and for which the 128 local government may not impose a public hearing; any action by 129 a governing body, reviewing body, or quasi-judicial body; a 130 variance; a conditional use permit, special permit, or special 131 exception; or any other discretionary regulation. 132 (f)ââDevelopmentâ has the same meaning as in s. 380.04(1) 133 and includes the division of a parent parcel into two or more 134 lots. 135 (g)ââDevelopment applicationâ means an application for 136 approval of any of the following: 137 1.âA lot split or subdivision. 138 2.âA plat or replat. 139 3.âA development bonus for additional height, density, or 140 floor area ratio. 141 4.âThe demolition of an existing structure, if the 142 demolition objectively complies with applicable regulations. 143 5.âAny other development order or development permit as 144 those terms are defined in s. 163.3164, except for building 145 permits. 146 (h)ââEligible lotâ means a lot that is: 147 1.âZoned for residential, commercial, industrial, or mixed 148 use; or 149 2.âPartly or wholly located within a flexibly zoned area 150 where development is permitted for a use thereof, 151 152 and is not located within an area of critical state concern 153 designated pursuant to s. 380.05. 154 (i)ââImposeâ means request or adopt, enact, establish, 155 maintain, enforce, mandate, compel, force, or otherwise require. 156 (j)ââLocal governmentâ means a county, municipality, or 157 special district. 158 (k)ââLotâ means a parcel, tract, tier, block, site, unit, 159 or any other division of land. 160 (l)ââObjectivelyâ means in a way that involves no personal 161 or subjective judgment by a public official and that is 162 uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform 163 benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the local 164 government and the development applicant, development proponent, 165 or property owner, as applicable. 166 (m)ââParent parcelâ means the original lot from which 167 subsequent lots are created. 168 (n)ââPermanent public transit stopâ means a stop or station 169 for passenger use of a bus rapid transit service, a commuter 170 rail service as defined in s. 341.301, an intercity rail 171 transportation system as defined in s. 341.301, a fixed-guideway 172 transportation system as defined in s. 341.031(2), or a 173 streetcar system. The term does not include any of the 174 following: 175 1.âA stop or station for a people-mover system in a public 176 use airport as defined in s. 332.004. 177 2.âA stop or station that is used exclusively for a freight 178 rail service as defined in s. 343.545(1). 179 3.âA stop or station in a rural community as defined in s. 180 288.0656(2) for an intercity rail transportation system. 181 (o)ââPopulationâ means, for a county or municipality, the 182 highest of the following population estimates: 183 1.âThe most recent decennial United States Census. 184 2.âThe most recent United States Census Bureau American 185 Community Survey 5-year estimate. 186 3.âThe most recent United States Census Bureau American 187 Community Survey 1-year estimate. 188 (p)ââRegulationâ means a comprehensive plan, a development 189 order, or a land development regulation as those terms are 190 defined in s. 163.3164 or any other local government ordinance, 191 resolution, policy, action, procedure, condition, guideline, 192 development agreement, or land development code. 193 (q)ââTier 1 TOD zoneâ means the area of all eligible lots 194 partly or wholly within a one-quarter mile radius of a permanent 195 public transit stop. 196 (r)ââTier 2 TOD zoneâ means the area of all eligible lots 197 partly or wholly within a one-quarter mile to one-half mile 198 radius of a permanent public transit stop, excluding any 199 eligible lot within a Tier 1 TOD zone. 200 (s)ââTransit-oriented developmentâ or âTODâ has the same 201 meaning as in s. 163.3164. 202 (4)(a)1.âBy December 1, 2026, the governing body of each 203 county or municipality shall adopt an ordinance, and the 204 governing body of each special district shall adopt a 205 resolution, establishing Tier 1 TOD zones and Tier 2 TOD zones 206 for each permanent public transit stop that was open for public 207 use within the local governmentâs jurisdiction during at least 208 one day between January 1, 2026, and July 1, 2026, or that 209 received a notice to proceed for construction within the local 210 governmentâs jurisdiction before July 1, 2026. By December 1, 211 2026, the local government shall incorporate TOD zones into its 212 comprehensive plan, notwithstanding s. 163.3184, land 213 development regulations, and any other applicable regulations. 214 2.âAfter December 1, 2026, the governing body of each 215 county or municipality shall adopt an ordinance, and the 216 governing body of each special district shall adopt a 217 resolution, establishing Tier 1 TOD zones and Tier 2 TOD zones 218 for each permanent public transit stop that opens for public use 219 within the local governmentâs jurisdiction after July 1, 2026, 220 or that receives a notice to proceed for construction within the 221 local governmentâs jurisdiction after July 1, 2026. The local 222 government shall establish such TOD zones within 6 months after 223 the permanent public transit stop opens for public use or 224 receives a notice to proceed for construction, whichever occurs 225 first. 226 (b)1.âIn addition to other existing and lawful uses, the 227 local government shall zone all eligible lots located within a 228 Tier 1 TOD zone or a Tier 2 TOD zone for mixed use. For purposes 229 of this subparagraph, the term âmixed useâ means that single 230 family and multifamily residential use, commercial use, and a 231 combination thereof are allowable uses by right, and the term 232 âcommercial useâ means activities associated with the sale, 233 rental, or distribution of products or the performance of 234 services related thereto, including, but not limited to, retail 235 sales and services; wholesale sales; rentals of equipment, 236 goods, or products; offices; restaurants; hotels as described in 237 s. 509.242(1)(a); food service vendors; sports arenas; theaters; 238 tourist attractions; and other for-profit business activities. 239 The term âcommercial useâ does not include: 240 a.âHome-based businesses or cottage food operations 241 undertaken on residential property, vacation rentals as 242 described in s. 509.242(1)(c), or uses that are accessory, 243 ancillary, incidental to the allowable uses, or allowed only on 244 a temporary basis; or 245 b.âFarms or farm operations as those terms are defined in 246 s. 823.14(3) or uses associated therewith, including the 247 packaging and sale of products raised on the premises. 248 2.âIn Tier 1 TOD zones, a local government may not impose 249 regulations that require any of the following: 250 a.âA maximum building height of less than 8 stories or 85 251 feet, or less than 4 stories or 45 feet for eligible lots 252 adjacent to a single-family home. 253 b.âA maximum floor area ratio for residential use of less 254 than 6.0, or less than 3.0 for eligible lots adjacent to a 255 single-family home. 256 c.âA maximum floor area ratio for commercial use of less 257 than 3.0, or less than 2.0 for eligible lots adjacent to a 258 single-family home. 259 d.âAny minimum setback requirement for the side, front, and 260 rear property lines. 261 e.âA requirement that greater than 10 percent of the lot 262 area be reserved for open space or permeable surface. 263 f.âA required minimum number of parking spaces. 264 265 The maximum building heights and floor area ratios specified in 266 this subparagraph are doubled for any eligible lot located 267 partly or wholly within a county with a population that exceeds 268 800,000 or within a municipality with a population that exceeds 269 75,000. 270 3.âIn Tier 2 TOD zones, a local government may not impose 271 regulations that require any of the following: 272 a.âA maximum building height of less than 4 stories or 45 273 feet, or less than 3 stories or 35 feet for eligible lots 274 adjacent to a single-family home. 275 b.âA maximum floor area ratio for residential use of less 276 than 3.0, or less than 2.0 for eligible lots adjacent to a 277 single-family home. 278 c.âA maximum floor area ratio for commercial use of less 279 than 3.0, or less than 2.0 for eligible lots adjacent to a 280 single-family home. 281 d.âAny minimum setback requirement for the side, front, or 282 rear property lines. 283 e.âA requirement that greater than 20 percent of the lot 284 area be reserved for open space or permeable surface. 285 f.âA required minimum number of parking spaces. 286 287 The maximum building heights and floor area ratios specified in 288 this subparagraph are doubled for any eligible lot located 289 partly or wholly within a county with a population that exceeds 290 800,000 or within a municipality with a population that exceeds 291 75,000. 292 4.âFor an eligible lot within a Tier 1 TOD zone or Tier 2 293 TOD zone, a local government may not impose any of the 294 following: 295 a.âAny limitation, restriction, or prohibition on single 296 family or multifamily dwellings. 297 b.âA maximum density, including, but not limited to, a 298 maximum number of dwelling units per lot or per acre. 299 c.âA minimum size for dwellings or dwelling units greater 300 than that required by the Florida Building Code. 301 (c)âA TOD zone established pursuant to this subsection may 302 not be reduced or eliminated thereafter, including for the 303 closure of a permanent public transit stop after the TOD zone is 304 established. 305 (5)âA local government may not impose a regulation that 306 prohibits, limits, or otherwise restricts residential or 307 commercial development authorized within a TOD zone under this 308 section for any eligible lot that contains historic property as 309 defined in s. 267.021, except: 310 (a)âRegulations relating to building design elements which 311 may be applied pursuant to s. 163.3202(5)(a)1.; or 312 (b)âRegulations that prohibit, limit, or otherwise restrict 313 demolition or alteration of a structure or building that is 314 individually listed in the National Register of Historic Places 315 or that is a contributing structure or building within a 316 historic district which was listed in the National Register of 317 Historic Places before January 1, 2000. 318 (6)(a)âA property owner or housing organization that is 319 aggrieved or adversely affected by a regulation imposed by a 320 local government in violation of this section may maintain a 321 cause of action for damages in the county in which the property 322 is located. As used in this paragraph, the term âhousing 323 organizationâ means a trade or industry group that constructs or 324 manages housing units, a nonprofit organization that provides or 325 advocates for increased access or reduced barriers to housing, 326 or a nonprofit organization that is engaged in public policy 327 research, education, or outreach that includes housing-policy 328 related issues. 329 (b)âIn a proceeding under this subsection, an aggrieved or 330 adversely affected party is entitled to the summary procedure 331 provided in s. 51.011, and the court shall advance the cause on 332 the calendar. The court shall review the evidence de novo and 333 enter written findings of fact based on the preponderance of the 334 evidence that a local government has imposed a regulation in 335 violation of this section. 336 (c)âThe court may do any of the following: 337 1.âEnter a declaratory judgment as provided by chapter 86. 338 2.âIssue a writ of mandamus. 339 3.âIssue an injunction to prevent a violation of this 340 section. 341 4.âRemand the matter to the land development regulation 342 commission for action consistent with the judgment. 343 (d)âA prevailing plaintiff is entitled to recover 344 reasonable attorney fees and costs, including reasonable 345 appellate attorney fees and costs. 346 (7)âA public transit provider as defined in s. 341.031(1) 347 is encouraged to develop land within Tier 1 and Tier 2 TOD zones 348 in accordance with this section. Any net proceeds from such 349 development shall be kept in the public transit agencyâs fund 350 for operations, maintenance, and capital improvements. Public 351 agencies, such as the Department of Transportation and local 352 governments, are also encouraged to develop the land within Tier 353 1 and Tier 2 TOD zones in accordance with this section and to 354 transfer a portion of the net proceeds to the public transit 355 agencyâs fund for operations, maintenance, and capital 356 improvements. 357 (8)âIf any provision of this section or its application to 358 any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does 359 not affect any other provisions or applications of this section 360 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or 361 application, and to this end the provisions of this section are 362 severable. 363 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.